Louisiana, session 2026, HB1220.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:1263(B)(1) through (7), (C)(1)(a) and (2)(b), and (D)(1), 1266,
and 1270(A)(introductory paragraph) and (9) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
37:1263(C)(3) and (D)(4) and (5) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1263. Louisiana State Board of Medical Examiners; membership; qualifications;
appointment; removal; terms
* * *
B. The board shall consist of ten voting members, all appointed by the
governor and subject to Senate confirmation as follows:
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1392 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1220
(1) Two members who are physicians from a list of names submitted by the
Louisiana State Medical Society. One of the members so appointed shall practice
in a parish or municipality with a population of less than twenty thousand people.
(2) One member who is a physician from a list of names submitted by the
Louisiana State University Health Sciences Center at New Orleans. At least every
other member appointed from a list provided for in this Paragraph shall be a minority
appointee. Nothing in this Paragraph shall preclude consecutive minority
appointments from lists provided for in this Paragraph.
(3) One member who is a physician from a list of names submitted by the
Louisiana State University Health Sciences Center at Shreveport. At least every
other member appointed from a list provided for in this Paragraph shall be a minority
appointee. Nothing in this Paragraph shall preclude consecutive minority
appointments from lists provided for in this Paragraph.
(4) One member who is a physician from a list of names submitted by the
Tulane Medical School.
(5) Two members who are physicians from a list submitted by the Louisiana
Medical Association.
(6) One member who is a physician from a list submitted by the Louisiana
Academy of Family Practice Physicians.
(7) One member who is a physician from a list submitted by the Louisiana
Hospital Association. At least every other member appointed from a list provided for
in this Paragraph shall be a minority appointee. Nothing in this Paragraph shall
preclude consecutive minority appointments from lists provided for in this
Paragraph.
* * *
C.(1) Each physician member of the board shall, at the time of appointment,
meet all of the following qualifications:
(a) Has been a resident of this state for not less than six months five years.
* * *
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1392 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1220
(2)
* * *
(b) The consumer member shall be a full voting member of the board with
all rights and privileges conferred on board members, except that the consumer
member shall not participate in the grading of individual examinations. The
consumer member shall serve at the pleasure of the governor.
(3) No member shall serve on the board if he is also a member of the
governing body of a nominating organization provided for in Subsection B of this
Section.
D.(1) The governor shall appoint the members of the board in accordance
with other the provisions of this Section and the state constitution. The governor
shall ensure that his appointments demonstrate race, gender, ethnic, and geographical
diversity and shall consider an allocation of medical specialties that broaden the
expertise of the physician members of the board.
* * *
(4) The governor shall request a list of nominees from the nominating
organization when he intends to fill a vacancy on the board. The nominating
organization shall respond to the governor's request within thirty days and provide
a list of nominees within ninety days of the request. If the nominating organization
fails to meet either deadline provided for in this Paragraph, the governor shall
appoint a physician of his choosing.
(5) The governor may select the president of the board from the members of
the board in accordance with R.S. 42:4(B)(1). If the governor does not select a
president, the members of board shall select a president by majority vote.
* * *
§1266. Meetings of board
The board shall hold at least one five regular meeting meetings each year and
special meetings as are necessary. A special meeting of the board may be called by
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1392 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1220
the president ,or at the written request of a majority of the board members, at any
place time when a majority of the board, or its president, deems it expedient.
* * *
§1270. Duties and powers of the board
A. The board shall do all of the following:
* * *
(9) Appoint executive staff as appropriate to fulfill the mission of the board.
The board shall, at a minimum, appoint the following staff:
(a) An executive director who is the administrative head of the board, has
operational oversight over all departments, and perform other such duties as may be
prescribed by the board. The executive director is not required to be a physician and
shall not participate in discussions related to investigations and discipline of
licensees.
(b) A a director of investigations to who shall act as the lead investigator for
any complaint regarding a physician received by the board or any investigation
regarding a physician initiated by the board upon its own motion in accordance with
R.S. 37:1285.2(A). The director of investigations shall serve at the pleasure of the
board and be answerable directly to the board. The director of investigations shall
be prohibited from concurrently serving as the executive director of the board. Any
person appointed by the board to serve as director of investigations shall be a
Louisiana-licensed physician who maintains board certification and has engaged in
the active practice of medicine in this state for at least five years.
* * *
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1392 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1220